Mississippi, session 2026, SB3111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-71-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-71-7.  (1)  There is hereby levied and assessed an excise tax upon each case of alcoholic beverages sold by the department to be collected from each retail licensee at the time of sale in accordance with the following schedule: (a)  Distilled spirits................ $ 2.50 per gallon (b)  Sparkling wine and champagne..... $ 1.00 per gallon (c)  Other wines, including native wines............... .............................................. $  .35 per gallon (2)  (a)  In addition to the tax levied by subsection (1) of this section, and in addition to any other markup collected, the division shall collect a markup of three percent (3%) on all alcoholic beverages, as defined in Section 67-1-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, which are sold by the division.  The proceeds of the markup shall be collected by the division from each purchaser at the time of purchase. (b)  Until June 30, 1987, the revenue derived from this three percent (3%) markup shall be deposited by the division in the State Treasury to the credit of the "Alcoholism Treatment and Rehabilitation Fund," a special fund which is hereby created in the State Treasury, and shall be used by the Division of Alcohol and Drug Abuse of the State Department of Mental Health and public or private centers or organizations solely for funding of treatment and rehabilitation programs for alcoholics and alcohol abusers which are sponsored by the division or public or private centers or organizations in such amounts as the Legislature may appropriate to the division for use by the division or public or private centers or organizations for such programs.  Any tax revenue in the fund which is not encumbered at the end of the fiscal year shall lapse to the General Fund.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Mental Health shall continue to seek funds from other sources and shall use the funds appropriated for the purposes of this section and Section 27-71-29 to match all federal funds which may be available for alcoholism treatment and rehabilitation. From and after July 1, 1987, the revenue derived from this three percent (3%) markup shall be deposited by the division in the State Treasury to the credit of the "Mental Health Programs Fund," a special fund which is hereby created in the State Treasury and shall be used by the State Department of Mental Health for the service programs of the department.  Any revenue in the "Alcoholism Treatment and Rehabilitation Fund" which is not encumbered at the end of Fiscal Year 1987 shall be deposited to the credit of the "Mental Health Programs Fund." (3)  There is levied and assessed upon the holder of a direct wine shipper's permit, a tax in the amount of fifteen and one-half percent (15.5%) of the sales price of each sale and shipment of wine made to a resident in this state.  The holder of a direct wine shipper's permit shall file a monthly report with the department along with a copy of the invoice for each sale and shipment of wine and remit any taxes due; however, no report shall be required for months in which no sales or shipments were made into this state.  The report, together with copies of the invoices and the payment of all taxes, shall be filed with the department not later than the twentieth day of the month following the month in which the shipment was made.  Permittees who fail to timely file and pay taxes as required by this subsection shall pay a late fee in the amount of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), in addition to any other penalty authorized by this article. (4)  Any taxes, markups and charges imposed in this section shall not be imposed on wine donated by a permittee to a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is registered with the Mississippi Secretary of State.  No more than ten (10) cases of wine per year may be exempt from such taxes, markups and charges.  The department may promulgate rules and regulations for administering this subsection. SECTION 2.  Section 27-71-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-71-11.  (1)  The department shall from time to time by resolution request the State Bond Commission to provide sufficient funds required to maintain an adequate alcoholic beverage inventory.  Said funds shall be provided under the provisions of Chapter 557, Laws of 1966. (2)  The department shall add to the cost of all alcoholic beverages a markup of twenty-seven and one-half percent (27-1/2%), inclusive of the three percent (3%) markup imposed by Section 27-71-7(2). (3)  In addition to other excise taxes and markups imposed in this section and in Section 27-71-7, the department shall add to the cost of all alcoholic beverages shipped a charge of Twenty-five Cents (25¢) per case, to be deposited into the ABC Warehouse Improvements Fund created in Section 67-1-211(2).  However, any unobligated amounts above Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) remaining in the ABC Warehouse Improvements Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be transferred to the State General Fund. (4)  Notwithstanding the contract for warehouse and distribution operations under Section 67-1-205, the department shall remain responsible for purchasing and selling alcoholic beverages.  The department shall sell alcoholic beverages at uniform prices throughout the state.  Pricing for all alcoholic beverages shall be set by the addition of the markup and taxes to the price at which the beverages were purchased by the department. (5)  A permittee's order shall qualify for shipping when it includes the minimum number of cases of alcoholic beverages as set by the department.  The department shall place qualifying orders in a queue for shipment in the order in which the orders are made.  An order of fewer than the minimum number of cases, and special orders, shall be added to the permittee's next qualified shipment.  The department shall give sufficient notice of any change in the minimum number of cases for shipping and shall allow the opportunity for comment. (6)  The department shall set a per-case shipping fee to be charged to permittees.  The department shall adjust the fee to match, as closely as possible, the shipping costs as defined in Section 67-1-201.  The shipping fee charged under this subsection shall be deposited to the credit of the ABC Shipping Fund created in Section 27-71-29. (7)  The department shall charge manufacturers a bailment fee of One Dollar and Fifty Cents ($1.50) per case of alcoholic beverages stored in the warehouse, to be deposited to the credit of the bond sinking fund created in Section 7(3) of Chapter 483, Laws of 2022. (8)  Any taxes, markups or charges imposed in this section shall not be imposed on wine donated by a permittee to a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is registered with the Mississippi Secretary of State.  No more than ten (10) cases of wine per year may be exempt from such taxes, markups and charges.  The department may promulgate rules and regulations for administering this subsection. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.